Washington statutes.
RCW 11.20.020

Application for probate—Hearing—Order—Proof—Record of testimony—Affidavits of attesting witnesses.

(1) Applications for the probate of a will and for letters testamentary, or either, may be made to the judge of the court having jurisdiction and the court may immediately hear the proofs and either probate or reject such will as the testimony may justify. Upon such hearing the court shall make and cause to be entered a formal order, either establishing and probating such will, or refusing to establish and probate the same, and such order shall be conclusive except in the event of a contest of such will as hereinafter provided. All testimony in support of the will shall be reduced to writing, signed by the witnesses, and certified by the judge of the court. If the application for probate of a will does not request the appointment of a personal representative and the court enters an adjudication of testacy establishing such will no further administration shall be required except as commenced pursuant to RCW 11.28.330 or 11.28.340.

(2) In addition to the foregoing procedure for the proof of wills, any or all of the attesting witnesses to a will may, at the request of the testator or, after his or her decease, at the request of the executor or any person interested under it, make an affidavit before any person authorized to administer oaths, stating such facts as they would be required to testify to in court to prove such will, which affidavit may be written on the will or may be affixed or logically associated with the will or a photographic copy of the will or an electronic will. The sworn statement of any witness so taken shall be accepted by the court as if it had been taken before the court.

(3) An electronic will, the custody of which has not been maintained by a qualified custodian, must be treated as a lost or destroyed will under RCW 11.20.070.

[ 2021 c 140 s 1015; 2010 c 8 s 2016; 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 2; 1974 ex.s. c 117 s 27; 1969 ex.s. c 126 s 1; 1965 c 145 s 11.20.020. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 10; RRS s 1380; prior: 1863 p 212 ss 85, 86; 1860 p 175 ss 52, 53.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 140 ss 1001-1016: See note following RCW 11.12.400.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 234: "If any provisions of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 30.]

Effective date—Application—1977 ex.s. c 234: "This 1977 amendatory act shall take effect on October 1, 1977 and shall apply to all proceedings in probate with respect to decedents whose deaths occurred after the effective date." [ 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 31.]

Application, construction—Severability—Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 117: See RCW 11.02.080 and notes following.

Will contests: Chapter 11.24 RCW.